Tennessee, session 114, HB0297.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 67-5-1005(a)(1), is amended by
adding the following language immediately after the third sentence of the subdivision:
Property that is qualified as agricultural, owned by two (2) individuals, and held under the
title, tenancy by the entireties, or the title, joint tenancy, is deemed to have unchanged
ownership upon the death or divorce of an owner if the property is retained by the other
owner through a right of survivorship.
SECTION 2. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 67-5-1006(a)(1), is amended by
adding the following language immediately after the third sentence of the subdivision:
Property that is qualified as forest land, owned by two (2) individuals, and held under the
title, tenancy by the entireties, or the title, joint tenancy, is deemed to have unchanged
ownership upon the death or divorce of an owner if the property is retained by the other
owner through a right of survivorship.
SECTION 3. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 67-5-1007(b)(1), is amended by
adding the following language immediately after the third sentence of the subdivision:
Property that is qualified as forest land, owned by two (2) individuals, and held under the
title, tenancy by the entireties, or the title, joint tenancy, is deemed to have unchanged
ownership upon the death or divorce of an owner if the property is retained by the other
owner through a right of survivorship.
HB0297
001600
- 1 -

SECTION 4. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
- 2 - 001600